Utah statutes.
72-10-117.   Aircraft landing permits -- Eligible aircraft -- Special
licenses -- Rules -- Proof of insurance -- Bonds.
(1) (a)  The county executive of any county may issue permits authorizing
aircraft to land on or take off from designated county roads.
(b)  Permits may be issued to aircraft operated:
(i)  as air ambulances;
(ii)  as pesticide applicators; or
(iii)  by or under contract with public utilities and used in connection with
inspection, maintenance, installation, operation, construction, or repair of
property owned or operated by the public utility.
(2)  Permits may also be issued by the county executive to other aircraft
under rules made by the division.
(3) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, the division shall make rules for issuing a special license
to:
(i)  an aircraft permitted by a county executive to land on a county road; and
(ii)  a pilot permitted to operate an aircraft licensed under this subsection
from a county road.
(b)  The rules made under this subsection shall include provisions for the
safety of the flying and motoring public.
(4)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the department shall make rules for the landing and taking off of
aircraft to which permits have been issued, which may include annual reports
of activities of the aircraft.
(5)  Prior to obtaining a permit or license to any aircraft, the applicant
shall file with the county executive and the division a certificate of
insurance executed by an insurance company or association authorized to
transact business in this state upon a form prescribed by the division that
there is in full force and effect a policy of insurance covering the aircraft
for liability against:
(a)  personal injury or death for any one person in an amount of $50,000 or
more;
(b)  any one accident in an amount of $100,000 or more; and
(c)  property damage in an amount of $50,000 or more.
(6)  In addition to the insurance required under this section, either the
county executive or the division may require the posting of a bond to
indemnify the county or division against liability resulting from issuing the
permit or license.
